src/scripts/Polish/stress.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define UnstressedVowelPhonem [a | on | e | en | i | o | u | ih ] ;

define setStress [a:a1|
on:on1|
e:e1|
en:en1|
i:i1|
o:o1|
u:u1|
ih:ih1
];

define procStressG2p setStress @-> ||
_ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ UnstressedVowelPhonem+ .#.,
_ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ UnstressedVowelPhonem+ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ .#.,
.#. \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ _ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ .#.;

define procStressLseq setStress @-> ||
_ \UnstressedVowelPhonem+ .#.,
_  .#.;

define procStress2 [a:a0|
on:on0|
e:e0|
en:en0|
i:i0|
o:o0|
u:u0|
ih:ih0
] @-> || _ ;
